Illinois, session 104th, SB2153.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Physical Therapy Act is amended by 5changing Section 1.3 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 90/1.3)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 1.3. Telehealth services.9    (a) Physical therapy through telehealth services may be 10used to address access issues to care, enhance care delivery, 11or increase the physical therapist's ability to assess and 12direct the patient's performance in the patient's own 13environment. 14    (b) Only a A physical therapist or physical therapist 15assistant working under the general supervision of a physical 16therapist may provide physical therapy through telehealth 17services pursuant to the terms and use defined in the 18Telehealth Act and the Illinois Insurance Code and subject to 19the following conditions: 20        (1) Physical therapists may use telehealth to perform 21    an initial physical therapy evaluation if one of the 22    following criteria is met:23            (i) the patient has a referral or diagnosis from a   SB2153 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09779 AAS 19845 b1        health care professional;2            (ii) the patient has an established relationship 3        with the physical therapist; or4            (iii) the physical therapist has the capacity to 5        perform or facilitate a referral for an in-person, 6        hands-on examination or re-examination by a physical 7        therapist at any time throughout the course of the 8        patient's care, as needed. Initial physical therapy 9        evaluations without a referral or established 10        diagnosis may only be performed by a licensed physical 11        therapist and cannot be performed via telehealth 12        unless necessary to address a documented hardship, 13        including, but not limited to, geographical, physical, 14        or weather-related conditions.15        (2) A physical therapist or a physical therapist 16    assistant may require the patient to undergo an in-person 17    visit instead of providing telehealth services. The use of 18    telehealth as a primary means of delivering physical 19    therapy must be an exception and documentation must 20    support the clinical justification. 21        (3) A patient receiving physical therapy via 22    telehealth must be able to request and receive in-person 23    care at any point during their treatment. 24        (4) A physical therapist providing telehealth must 25    have the capacity to provide or be able to facilitate a 26    referral to in-person care within the State of Illinois.  SB2153 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09779 AAS 19845 b1        (5) A physical therapist or a physical therapist 2    assistant may engage in the practice of telehealth 3    services in this State to the extent of the physical 4    therapist's or the physical therapist assistant's scope of 5    practice as established in this Act and consistent with 6    the standards of care for in-person services. This Section 7    shall not be construed to authorize the delivery of 8    physical therapy services in a setting or in a manner not 9    otherwise authorized by law.10        (6) A physical therapist or a physical therapist 11    assistant working under the general supervision of a 12    physical therapist treating a patient located in this 13    State through telehealth services must be licensed or 14    authorized to practice physical therapy in this State.15    (c) The Department may, in consultation with the 16Department of Human Services and the Department of Early 17Childhood, exempt physical therapists and physical therapist 18assistants providing physical therapy services as part of the 19Illinois Early Intervention Program, an individualized 20education program, or a federal Section 504 plan through a 21school system from this Section by rule to address service 22delays.23    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to allow 24noncompliance with any requirements under the federal 25Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, the Early 26Intervention Services System Act, the Department of Early   SB2153 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09779 AAS 19845 b1Childhood Act, or any other State or federal law or rules. 2(Source: P.A. 103-849, eff. 1-1-25.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.